Utah statutes.
15-9-109.   Registration and renewal fees.

(1)  An application for registration or renewal of registration shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount determined by the division in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(2)  The division shall establish fees for:

(a)  an initial application for registration;

(b)  an application for registration based upon a certificate of registration or licensure issued by another state;

(c)  an application for renewal of registration; and

(d)  an application for renewal of registration based upon an application for renewal of registration or licensure submitted in another state.

